Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 36.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-656
Brain injury registry; Department of Health and Human Services; duties.

In order to implement the intent and purposes of the Brain Injury Registry Act, the department shall:

(1) Adopt and promulgate necessary rules and regulations to carry out the act, including, but not limited to, a uniform system of classification of brain or head injury which is consistent with medically and clinically accepted standards and definitions for use in reporting by treating medical personnel and hospitals. In adopting and promulgating such rules and regulations, the department shall be guided by the standards and definitions of the International Classification of Disease, Clinical Modification Coding System of the World Health Organization;

(2) Execute any contracts that the department deems necessary to carry out the act; and

(3) Comply with all necessary requirements in order to obtain funds or grants.

Laws 1992, LB 308, § 4;

Laws 1993, LB 536, § 121;

Laws 2005, LB 301, § 66;

Laws 2008, LB928, § 36.